Maryland, session 2026, SB0113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Area agency on aging” means the local agency that the Department
designates in accordance with the Older Americans Act of 1965 to administer the delivery
of a comprehensive and coordinated [plan] SYSTEM of social and other services and
activities for older adults in a planning and service area.
(c) “Community for a Lifetime” means a community certified under § 10–804 of
this title.
(d) “Department” means the Department of Aging.
(E) “LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN” MEANS A MULTISECTOR PLAN
ON AGING THAT:
(1) TRANSFORMS PROGRAMS, SERVICES, POLICIES, INSTITUTIONS,
AND SYSTEMS TO ADDRESS THE GROWING POPULATION OF OLDER ADULTS; AND
(2) INCORPORATES STREAMLINED, INNOVATIVE APPROACHES TO
AGING SERVICES.
[(e)] (F) “Planning and service area” means an area of the State that the
Department designates in accordance with the Older Americans Act of 1965 for the
planning and administration of social, health, and other services for older adults.
[(f)] (G) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Aging.
10–204.

SENATE BILL 113 3
(a) The Secretary shall administer the programs and activities that the federal
government delegates to the State under the Older Americans Act of 1965 that are not
otherwise committed by law to another unit of State government.
(b) The Secretary:
(1) is a member of the Governor’s Executive Council; and
(2) shall cooperate with and receive the cooperation of State, federal, and
local governmental units to carry out the purposes of this title.
(c) The Secretary shall LEAD IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY READY
MARYLAND PLAN, WITH THE FOLLOWING GOALS:
(1) BUILDING A LONGEVITY ECOSYSTEM;
(2) PROMOTING ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY;
(3) PREPARING STATE RESIDENTS TO AFFORD LONGEVITY; AND
(4) OPTIMIZING HEALTH, WELLNESS, AND MOBILITY.
(D) TO IMPLEMENT THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN, THE
SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) evaluate the service needs of [seniors] OLDER ADULTS in the State;
(2) determine the extent to which existing public and private programs
[meet the needs of seniors], POLICIES, INSTITUTIONS, AND SYSTEMS SUPPORT OLDER
ADULTS;
(3) establish priorities for meeting the needs of [seniors] OLDER ADULTS;
AND
(4) coordinate, subject to existing law, assess and evaluate, and educate the
public and professionals about all State and local programs and services, both public and
private, that:
(I) relate and are important to the well–being of [seniors] OLDER
ADULTS in the State[, including programs and services in the areas of:
(i) income maintenance;
(ii) public health;

SENATE BILL 113
(iii) mental health;
(iv) housing and urban development;
(v) employment;
(vi) education;
(vii) recreation; and
(viii) rehabilitation of seniors with physical or mental disabilities; and
(5) develop a statewide plan incorporating local plans for a comprehensive
and coordinated system of health, social, and community services for seniors, including
housing, and institutional and noninstitutional care]; AND
(II) ARE DESIGNED TO ASSIST OLDER ADULTS AND FAMILY
CAREGIVERS IN LEADING INDEPENDENT AND DIGNIFIED LIVES IN THEIR OWN
HOMES AND COMMUNITIES.
[(d)] (E) The Secretary shall:
(1) represent the interests of [seniors] OLDER ADULTS by serving as an
advocate FOR POLICY, SYSTEMS, AND INSTITUTIONAL CHANGE at all levels of
government AND WITHIN THE PRIVATE SECTOR IN SUPPORT OF THE LONGEVITY
READY MARYLAND PLAN;
(2) [consult with and advise the secretaries of the principal departments of
State government] EMPHASIZE CROSS–SECTOR COLLABORATION, INCLUDING
CONSULTING AND ADVISING UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT AND STATE BOARDS
AND COMMISSIONS about [the programs and services for seniors that are the primary
responsibility of those departments] ANY ACTION THE UNIT, BOARD, OR COMMISSION
MAY TAKE TO ASSIST IN IMPLEMENTING THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN;
(3) consult with the Commission on Aging on [all matters pertaining to
programs for seniors] IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND
PLAN;
(4) provide consultation and technical assistance to [communities and civic
groups] ORGANIZATIONS AND OTHER ENTITIES OR PERSONS developing local services
for [seniors] OLDER ADULTS IN PARTNERSHIP WITH AREA AGENCIES ON AGING AND
OTHER ORGANIZATIONS AND ENTITIES FUNDED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(5) maintain a [clearinghouse of information] SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES
INFORMATION, REFERRALS, AND COUNSELING FOR OLDER ADULTS AND THEIR

SENATE BILL 113 5
CAREGIVERS related to the interests of [seniors] OLDER ADULTS AND THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN; and
(6) review and recommend [policies] LEGISLATION AND OTHER POLICY
ACTION to the Governor on publicly funded plans [and], programs, INSTITUTIONS, AND
SYSTEMS that affect [seniors] OLDER ADULTS AND THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN; AND
(7) MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE RESOURCE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE FOR MONITORING IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY
READY MARYLAND PLAN; AND
(8) INCORPORATE STRATEGIES INCLUDED IN PLANS DEVELOPED BY
LOCAL AREA AGENCIES ON AGING AND OTHER LOCAL ENTITIES.
[(e)] (F) The Secretary may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of law
that are within the jurisdiction of the Secretary.
10–206.
(a) On or before January 1 each year, the Secretary shall report to the Governor
and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly ON:
(1) THE ALLOCATION OF FUNDS MADE AVAILABLE FOR SENIOR
CITIZEN ACTIVITIES CENTERS DISTRIBUTED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) A SUMMARY OF KEY ACTIVITIES FUNDED AT SENIOR CITIZEN
ACTIVITIES CENTERS.
[(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section that shall include:
(1) with the advice and recommendation of the Commission on Aging:
(i) a description of the senior citizen activities centers in each
county;
(ii) the allocation and use of funds made available for senior citizen
activities centers;
(iii) the results of any studies; and
(iv) any recommendations for legislation; and

SENATE BILL 113
(2) information regarding the operation and performance of accessible
housing services counseling provided by the Aging and Disability Resource Center
Program.]
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE SECRETARY SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE A SUMMARY OF:
(I) THE PROGRESS MADE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR TO IMPLEMENT THE MOST RECENTLY PUBLISHED
COMPREHENSIVE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN;
(II) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LEGISLATION, POLICY CHANGE,
OR OTHER RELATED PLANNING OR ADVOCACY EFFORTS MADE BY THE COMMISSION
ON AGING TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(III) ANY STUDY, SURVEY, OR OTHER FORM OF RESEARCH
CONDUCTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE COMMISSION ON AGING; AND
(IV) ANY AVAILABLE RESEARCH AND BEST PRACTICES
REVIEWED BY THE COMMISSION ON AGING.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, AND EVERY 4 YEARS ON JULY 1
THEREAFTER, THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE GOVERNOR AND, SUBJECT
TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
AN UPDATED COMPREHENSIVE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN THAT:
(1) COMPLIES WITH § 10–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) INCLUDES PROGRESS MADE ON EXISTING GOALS, OBJECTIVES,
AND STRATEGIES IDENTIFIED IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING LONGEVITY READY
MARYLAND PLAN;
(3) MAINTAINS EXISTING GOALS AND INCLUDES ANY ADDITIONAL
GOALS; AND
(4) UPDATES OBJECTIVES AND STRATEGIES IF APPROPRIATE BASED
ON EVOLVING CIRCUMSTANCES AND POPULATION PROJECTIONS; AND

SENATE BILL 113 7
(5) IS INFORMED BY THE STATE PLAN ON AGING AS REQUIRED BY
THE OLDER AMERICANS ACT OF 1965 AND OTHER RELEVANT STATE AND LOCAL
PLANS AND AGENCY COLLABORATIONS.
10–208.
(a) There is a Commission on Aging in the Department.
(b) (1) The Commission consists of [13] THE FOLLOWING members
[appointed by the Governor as follows]:
(i) [1 shall be a] ONE member of the Senate of Maryland, [who may
not vote] APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(ii) [1 shall be a] ONE member of the [Maryland] House of
Delegates, [who may not vote] APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE; [and]
(iii) [11 shall be selected to reflect the geographic diversity of the
State and because of their interest in the needs of seniors] THE SECRETARY OF AGING,
OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(IV) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR:
1. ONE DIRECTOR OF AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING,
SERVING AS THREE DIRECTORS OF AREA AGENCIES ON AGING, INCLUDING THE
PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF AREA AGENCIES ON AGING;
2. THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF ORGANIZATIONS
LOCATED IN THE STATE THAT ADVOCATE FOR OLDER ADULTS AND CAREGIVERS;
3. FIVE SIX EXPERTS ON AGING REPRESENTING THE
DISCIPLINES OF HEALTH CARE, TECHNOLOGY, ACADEMIA, INNOVATION, CONSUMER
PROTECTION, AND THE PRIVATE SECTOR AND PHILANTHROPY; AND
4. FIVE INDIVIDUALS WITH A DEMONSTRATED INTEREST
IN THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN; AND
5. ONE VETERAN WITH A DEMONSTRATED INTEREST IN
THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN.
(2) [At least 7 members shall be at least 55 years old] TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP SHALL REFLECT THE AGE, RACE,
ETHNICITY, DISABILITY, GENDER IDENTITY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, IMMIGRANT

SENATE BILL 113
HERITAGE, LIVED AND PROFESSIONAL EXPERIENCE, AND REGIONAL GEOGRAPHIC
REPRESENTATION DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
[(c)] (D) (1) The term of a member of the Commission is 4 years.
(2) The terms of NEW members appointed under subsection [(b)(1)(iii)]
(B)(1)(IV) of this section are staggered as required by the terms provided for members of
the Commission on October 1, [2007] 2026.
(3) A member of the Commission appointed under subsection [(b)(1)(iii)]
(B)(1)(IV) of this section may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(4) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(5) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(6) A MEMBER WHO FAILS TO ATTEND AT LEAST 50% OF THE
MEETINGS DURING ANY CONSECUTIVE 12–MONTH PERIOD SHALL BE CONSIDERED
TO HAVE RESIGNED.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE FREQUENCY, DATES, TIMES,
AND PLACES OF ITS MEETINGS.
[(d)] (F) (1) From among the members of the Commission, the [Governor]
SECRETARY:
(I) shall designate [a] THE chair OF THE COMMISSION; AND
(II) MAY DESIGNATE A VICE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.
(2) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS THEN SERVING ON THE
COMMISSION IS A QUORUM.
(3) THE CHAIR MAY ESTABLISH SUBCOMMITTEES OF THE
COMMISSION.
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY CONSULT AND COLLABORATE WITH LOCAL
COMMISSIONS ON AGING.
[(e)] (G) A member of the Commission:

SENATE BILL 113 9
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations as provided in the State budget.
[(f)] (H) The Commission shall:
(1) exercise the powers and perform the duties specified in this title;
(2) [review:
(i) ongoing statewide programs and activities for seniors; and
(ii) new statewide programs for seniors before the programs are
implemented; and
(3) make recommendations to the Secretary about statewide programs and
activities for seniors] REVIEW AND ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE LONGEVITY
READY MARYLAND PLAN AND OVERALL PROGRESS OF THE DEPARTMENT AND
MULTISECTOR PARTNERS IN IMPLEMENTING THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
MOST RECENTLY PUBLISHED LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN;
(3) ADVISE THE SECRETARY ON LEGISLATIVE, POLICY, AND OTHER
SYSTEMS CHANGES THAT COULD ASSIST WITH IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLAN; AND
(4) ADVISE THE SECRETARY ON ANY UPDATE TO THE LONGEVITY
READY MARYLAND PLAN REQUIRED BY § 10–206 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING
ANY UPDATE TO THE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, AND STRATEGIES TO BE INCLUDED IN
SUBSEQUENT LONGEVITY READY MARYLAND PLANS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The terms of the members of the Commission on Aging serving on October 1,
2026, shall continue until the expiration of the member’s term.
(b) The terms of the members of the Commission on Aging appointed in
accordance with § 10–208(b)(1)(iv) of the Human Services Article, as enacted by Section 1
of this Act, shall expire as follows:
(1) four in 2028;
(2) five in 2029; and

SENATE BILL 113
(3) five in 2030.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.